Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2854
Pharmacist intern; qualifications; registration; powers.

(1) A pharmacist intern shall be (a) at least eighteen years of age and (b)(i) a student currently enrolled in an accredited pharmacy program, (ii) a graduate of an accredited pharmacy program serving his or her internship, or (iii) a graduate of a pharmacy program located outside the United States which is not accredited and who has successfully passed equivalency examinations approved by the board. Intern registration based on enrollment in or graduation from an accredited pharmacy program shall expire not later than fifteen months after the date of graduation or at the time of professional licensure, whichever comes first. Intern registration based on graduation from a pharmacy program located outside of the United States which is not accredited shall expire not later than fifteen months after the date of issuance of the registration or at the time of professional licensure, whichever comes first.

(2) A pharmacist intern may compound and dispense drugs or devices and fill prescriptions only in the presence of and under the immediate personal supervision of a licensed pharmacist. Such licensed pharmacist shall either be (a) the person to whom the pharmacy license is issued or a person in the actual employ of the pharmacy licensee or (b) the delegating pharmacist designated in a delegated dispensing agreement by a hospital with a delegated dispensing permit.

(3) Performance as a pharmacist intern under the supervision of a licensed pharmacist shall be predominantly related to the practice of pharmacy and shall include the keeping of records and the making of reports required under state and federal statutes. The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as may be required to establish standards for internship.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,144;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 950;

Laws 2011, LB179, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 16.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.